Utah statutes.
67-19-15.7.   Promotion -- Reclassification -- Market adjustment.

(1) (a)  If an employee is promoted or the employee's position is reclassified to a higher salary range maximum, the agency shall place the employee within the new range of the position.

(b) An agency may not set an employee's salary:

(i)  higher than the maximum in the new salary range; and

(ii)  lower than the minimum in the new salary range of the position.

(c)  Except for an employee under schedule IN or TL under Section 67-19-15, the agency shall grant a salary increase of at least 5% to an employee who is promoted.

(2)  An agency shall adjust the salary range for an employee whose salary range is approved by the Legislature for a market comparability adjustment consistent with Subsection 67-19-12(4)(c)(v):

(a)  at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and

(b)  consistent with appropriations made by the Legislature.

(3)  Department-initiated revisions in the state classification system that result in consolidation or reduction of class titles or broadening of pay ranges:

(a)  may not be regarded as a reclassification of the position or promotion of the employee; and

(b)  are exempt from the provisions of Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 249, 2010 General Session

